Maryland, session 2026, HB0320.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
9–303.
(d) The governing body of Anne Arundel County may grant, by law, a property
tax credit under this section against the county tax imposed on real property:
(1) that is subject to the State’s or county’s agricultural land preservation
program; OR
(2) (I) THAT IS LOCATED IN A RURAL LEGACY AREA AS DEFINED
IN § 5–9A–02 OF THE NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE; AND
(II) FOR WHICH THE PROPERTY OWNER HAS SOLD THE
DEVELOPMENT RIGHTS UNDER THE RURAL LEGACY PROGRAM ESTABLISHED
UNDER TITLE 5, SUBTITLE 9A OF THE NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 1 –